Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Mobile Homes and Recreational Vehicles

227.550.
Definitions for KRS 227.550 to 227.660, 227.990, and 227.992.

As used in KRS

227.550

to

227.660

,

227.990

, and

227.992

, unless the context requires a different definition:

“Seal” means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development seal for manufactured homes;

“Class B1 Seal” and “Class B2 Seal” mean seals issued pursuant to subsection (1) of KRS

227.600

;

“Retailer” means any person, firm, or corporation, who sells or offers for sale two (2) or more manufactured homes, mobile homes, or recreational vehicles in any consecutive twelve (12) month period. The term “retailer” shall not include:

A manufacturer, as defined in this section;

Any bank, trust company, or lending institution that is subject to state or federal regulation, with regard to the disposition of its own repossessed manufactured housing; or

A licensed real estate agent who acts as a negotiator between an owner and a prospective purchaser and does not acquire ownership or possession of manufactured homes for resale purposes;

“Established place of business” means a fixed and permanent place of business in this state, including an office building and hard surface lot of suitable character and adequate facilities and qualified personnel, for the purpose of performing the functional business and duties of a retailer, which shall include the books, records, files, and equipment necessary to properly conduct such business, or a building having sufficient space therein in which the functional duties of a retailer may be performed. The place of business shall not consist of a residence, tent, temporary stand, or open lot. It shall display a suitable sign identifying the retailer and his business;

“Federal act” means the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42

U.S.C. secs. 5401

et seq., as amended, and rules and regulations issued thereunder;

“Manufactured home” means a single-family residential dwelling constructed in accordance with the federal act, manufactured after June 15, 1976, and designed to be used as a single-family residential dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein. The manufactured home may also be used as a place of business, profession, or trade by the owner, the lessee, or the assigns of the owner or lessee and may comprise an integral unit or condominium structure. Buildings the construction of which is not preempted by the federal act are subject to building code requirements of KRS Chapter 198B;

“Factory-built housing” means manufactured homes, mobile homes, or mobile office units;

“Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures manufactured homes and sells to Kentucky retailers;

“Mobile home” means a factory-built structure manufactured prior to June 15, 1976, which was not required to be constructed in accordance with the federal act;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings, and Construction in the Public Protection Cabinet;

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle not requiring a special permit for movement on Kentucky highways. The basic entities are: travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, motor home, and park vehicle;

Travel trailer: A vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, and of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when drawn by a motorized vehicle, and with a living area of less than two hundred twenty (220) square feet, excluding built-in equipment (such as wardrobes, closets, cabinets, kitchen units, or fixtures) and bath and toilet rooms.

Camping trailer: A vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the camp site to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use.

Truck campers: A portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor, and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck.

Park vehicle: A vehicle which:

Is built on a single chassis mounted on wheels;

Is primarily designed as temporary living quarters for seasonal or destination camping and which may be connected to utilities necessary for operation of installed fixtures and appliances;

Has a gross trailer area not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in the set-up mode; and

Has a gross trailer area not less than two hundred forty (240) square feet and is certified by the manufacturer as complying with the current ANSI standard or the generally accepted industry standard as adopted by the department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

Motor home: A vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van which is an integral part of the completed vehicle;

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Federal Department of Housing and Urban Development; and

“ANSI” means the American National Standards Institute.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 1; 1976, ch. 136, § 1; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 19, § 1, effective May 12, 1979; 1980, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 181, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 395, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 217, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 411, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 72, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A regulation, adopted by a city or county legislative body, which includes modular homes in the definition of “mobile homes” is invalid since it is at variance with the statutory definition of that term.

OAG 75-249

.

This section does not apply to real estate brokers and salesmen who list for sale mobile homes which are classified as real estate by the property valuation administrator under KRS

132.750

(now repealed).

OAG 77-57

.

A mobile home broker who acts as a “mere negotiator” between a mobile home owner and prospective purchasers is not considered a dealer under the Mobile Home Recreational Vehicle Act (MHRVA); however, if the broker acquires ownership or possession for resale purposes of three or more mobile homes in any consecutive 12-month period, the broker becomes a dealer subject to the provisions of the MHRVA and accompanying regulations. Furthermore, once a person qualifies as a dealer, his or her duty to inspect and certify mobile homes applies to all mobile homes that he or she sells or offers for sale and there are no transactional exemptions.

OAG 83-261

, 84-347.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Precomplaint Investigations Under the Kentucky Consumer Protection Act: Validity and Scope of the Civil Investigation Demand, 65 Ky. L.J. 169 (1976-77).

227.555.
Smoke-detector and egress requirements for manufactured or mobile homes — Notices of requirements and penalty — Limitation on enforceability — Relationship to local ordinances — Specific penalty.

Every manufactured or mobile home as defined in KRS

227.550

shall have:

At least one (1) working smoke detector located inside the home near the bedroom areas on each floor level; and

At least two (2) operable means of egress, if the home was originally equipped with at least two (2) means.

The department, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, shall design and cause to be placed:

At each vehicle entrance to a manufactured home park or community as defined in KRS

219.320

, a notice stating the requirements set out in subsection (1) of this section, the penalty for noncompliance set out in subsection (5) of this section, and any other information it deems necessary to effect the purposes of this section; and

In each county clerk’s office, a notice stating the requirements set out in subsection (1) of this section, the penalty for noncompliance set out in subsection (5) of this section, and any other information it deems necessary to effect the purposes of this section.

No public servant with the authority to issue a citation shall enter a manufactured or mobile home solely for the purpose of determining whether or not the manufactured or mobile home is in compliance with this section.

No ordinance contrary to subsections (1) and (3) of this section may be enacted by any unit of local government, and the provisions of subsections (1) and (3) shall supersede any local ordinance to the contrary. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any city which has adopted or may in the future adopt the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act under KRS Chapter 383.

The owners of manufactured homes and mobile homes located within a manufactured home park or community which do not comply with subsection (1) of this section shall be responsible for the correction of any violation.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a violation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 412, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 73, effective June 29, 2017.

227.560.
Manufactured Home Certification and Licensure Board — Membership — Compensation — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 2; 1976, ch. 136, § 2; 1978, ch. 154, § 21, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 340, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 511, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 134, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 74, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 256, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 413, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 17, effective June 8, 2011; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

227.565.
Recreational Vehicle Certification and Licensure Board — Membership — Compensation — Meetings. [Repealed.]

227.570.
Construction and installation standards and requirements for manufactured homes, mobile homes, and previously owned recreational vehicles — Certified installer seal — Inspection — Fees.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:

Establish a process for certifying installers, licensing retailers, and issuing certificates of acceptability to qualifying manufacturers pursuant to KRS

227.550

to

227.660

;

Establish and enforce standards and requirements for the installation of plumbing, heating, and electrical systems in manufactured homes and mobile homes and for previously owned recreational vehicles as it determines are reasonably necessary in order to protect the health and safety of the occupants and the public; and

Establish and enforce standards and requirements for the body and frame design, construction, and installation of manufactured homes and mobile homes as it determines are reasonably necessary in order to protect the health and safety of the occupants and the public.

All installations of manufactured homes and mobile homes shall be performed:

By an installer certified by the department; and

In accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions, if available, or the current ANSI standard or the generally accepted industry standard as adopted by the department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

A certified installer shall apply for a certified installer seal prior to installing a manufactured home or a mobile home. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a schedule of fees and the requirements for purchase and application of the seal, report procedures, and attachment of the certified installer seal.

The installation of a new manufactured home shall be inspected under subsection (3) of this section. The retailer of the inspected property shall pay a new manufactured home installation inspection fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

The department shall specify the new manufactured home installation fee established in subsection (4) of this section through the promulgation of an administrative regulation. The department may increase the fee, but by no more than ten percent (10%) per year, and at no time shall the fee exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

All fees received by the department under this section shall be deposited in the trust and agency fund specified in KRS 227.620(5).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 3; 1976, ch. 136, § 4; 1980, ch. 200, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 340, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 118, § 1, effective January 1, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 414, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 74, effective June 29, 2017.

227.580.
Certificates of acceptability — Requirements for issuance.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer to manufacture, import, or sell manufactured homes within this state unless that manufacturer has been issued a certificate of acceptability for such manufactured homes from the department or its designee. This subsection shall not apply to manufactured homes manufactured in this state and designated for delivery to and sale in another state.

The department shall require that the manufacturer establish and submit to the department for approval systems for quality control for recreational vehicles prior to the issuance of a certificate of acceptability. Certificates of acceptability shall be numbered and a record shall be kept by the department, by number, of the certificates issued to manufacturers.

A manufacturer to which a certificate of acceptability has been issued shall not modify in any way its manufacturing specifications without prior written approval of the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 4; 1976, ch. 136, § 5; 1980, ch. 200, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 340, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 217, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 415, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 75, effective June 29, 2017.

227.590.
Administrative regulations.

The department, subject to any applicable requirements of KRS 198B.030(8), shall establish and enforce administrative regulations reasonably required to effectuate the provisions of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

and to carry out the department’s responsibilities as a state administrative agency for the enforcement and administration of the federal act.

At least thirty (30) days before the adoption or promulgation of any change in or addition to the administrative regulations authorized in subsection (5) of this section, the department shall mail to all manufacturers possessing valid certificates of acceptability and retailers possessing valid licenses a notice including a copy of the proposed changes and additions and the time and place that the department will consider any objections to the proposed changes and additions. After giving the notice required by this section, the department shall afford interested persons an opportunity to participate through submission of written data, views, or arguments with or without opportunity to present the same orally in any manner.

Every administrative regulation or modification, amendment, or repeal of an administrative regulation promulgated by the department shall state the date it shall take effect.

Notwithstanding KRS

227.550

to

227.660

, the department shall have the authority to promulgate administrative regulations exempting manufacturers and retailers from the provisions of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

when manufactured homes or mobile homes are brought into this state for exhibition only.

All administrative regulations, including codes, fees, and charges, promulgated or adopted by the department pursuant to KRS

227.550

to

227.660

shall be prepared and filed in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The department shall have the authority to promulgate administrative regulations to issue temporary licenses, not to exceed thirty (30) days, to out- of-state retailers for the purpose of participating in manufactured home shows in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 5; 1976, ch. 203, § 1; 1980, ch. 200, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 340, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 217, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 118, § 4, effective January 1, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 416, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 76, effective June 29, 2017.

227.600.
Seal required on manufactured homes, mobile homes, and recreational vehicles offered for sale — Seal for manufactured homes and mobile homes purchased in another state.

Any retailer who has acquired a previously owned manufactured home, mobile home, or recreational vehicle without a seal shall apply to the department for the appropriate seal by submitting an affidavit that the unit has been brought up to or meets reasonable standards established by the department for previously owned manufactured homes, mobile homes, or recreational vehicles. Those manufactured homes or mobile homes taken in trade shall be reinspected and certified. A numbered Class B1 Seal shall be affixed by the retailer to the unit prior to sale. A seal shall not be required if the retailer submits an affidavit that the unit will not be resold for use by the public. A retailer shall not transport or install a manufactured or mobile home which is to be used for residential purposes which does not have a Class B1 Seal.

The owner of any manufactured home or mobile home that is not covered by the federal act, was purchased in another state, and does not bear a seal of approval shall purchase a seal from the department. Application to purchase a seal of approval shall be made to the department.

The department shall make available suitable forms for application for seals of approval for previously owned manufactured homes or mobile homes which are not covered by the federal act and for previously owned recreational vehicles.

The clerk of the county in which a manufactured home, mobile home, or previously owned recreational vehicle is sought to be registered, which was purchased out of Kentucky, shall require production of proof of purchase of a seal of approval as provided in subsection (2) of this section before registering or issuing a license for any manufactured home, mobile home, or previously owned recreational vehicle.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 6; 1976, ch. 136, § 6; 1976, ch. 237, § 1; 1980, ch. 200, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 340, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 217, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 417, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 77, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is the legislative intent of this section that every mobile home or recreational vehicle in Kentucky must bear the fire marshal’s seal before it is registered in Kentucky regardless of whether it is brought into Kentucky by a dealer or by an individual owner.

OAG 80-422

.

227.605.
Class B1 Seal required prior to sale or use as a dwelling of previously owned manufactured or mobile home transported into Commonwealth — Homes installed before July 13, 2004, excepted.

No person shall transport into the Commonwealth of Kentucky any previously owned manufactured or mobile home for the purpose of resale or use as a dwelling in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, unless the previously owned manufactured or mobile home has a B1 Seal attached to it prior to resale or use as a dwelling. The application and certification procedures for the attachment of the B1 Seal prior to the resale or occupancy of the manufactured or mobile home shall be established by the department through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. Nothing in this section shall require a person who owns a manufactured or mobile home in another state and who transports that manufactured or mobile home into the Commonwealth of Kentucky to use as that person’s dwelling to obtain a Class B seal.

Except for manufactured or mobile homes installed within the Commonwealth of Kentucky before July 13, 2004, no person shall sell, lease, rent, or furnish for use as a dwelling in the Commonwealth of Kentucky any previously owned manufactured or mobile home that does not bear a B1 Seal and which is not installed in compliance with the manufacturer’s instructions, if available, or the current ANSI standard or the generally accepted industry standard as adopted by the department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 74, § 13, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 418, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 78, effective June 29, 2017.

227.610.
Licensing of retailers — Liability insurance required.

The department or its designee shall license retailers under KRS

227.550

to

227.660

. The issuance of a license shall be contingent upon the applicant’s chief managing officer passing a test administered by the department. Before issuing a license, the department shall require proof of liability insurance which shall name the department in the certificate of insurance, and the license shall be null and void if there is a lapse of coverage in insurance.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 7; 2004, ch. 74, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 419, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 79, effective June 29, 2017.

227.620.
Application for license — Fees — Fund — Business location specified — Reports and records.

A retailer shall not engage in business in this state without a license issued by the department pursuant to KRS

227.550

to

227.660

.

Application for license shall be made to the department or its designee at such time, in such form and contain such information as the department shall require and shall be accompanied by the required fee. The department may require in the application, or otherwise, any information it deems essential to safeguarding the public interest in the locality in which the applicant proposes to engage in business, all of which may be considered by the department in determining the fitness of the applicant to engage in business as set forth in KRS

227.550

to

227.660

.

All licenses shall be granted or refused within thirty (30) days after the application is received. The initial license for a retailer shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month in the following year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial licenses issued for less than twelve (12) months. Renewed licenses shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month of each year after the date of issuance of the renewed license.

The license fee for a calendar year or part thereof shall be established by the department, subject to the following maximums:

The department may establish a monitoring inspection fee in an amount established by the secretary. This monitoring inspection fee shall be an amount paid by each manufactured home manufacturer in this state for each manufactured home produced by the manufacturer in this state. The monitoring inspection fee shall be paid by the manufacturer to the secretary or the secretary’s agent, who shall distribute the fees collected from all manufactured home manufacturers among the states approved and conditionally approved by the secretary based on the number of new manufactured homes whose first location after leaving the manufacturing plant is on the premises of a distributor, retailer, or purchaser in that state, and the extent of participation of the state in the joint team monitoring program established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, as amended.

(1)

For manufacturers, a “certificate of acceptability” shall be subject to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500);

(2)

For retailers, the maximum license fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each established place of business;

(3)

The fee for a “Class B Seal” for recreational vehicles shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) per seal and the application form and seal shall be made available from the department; and

(4)

The fee for a “Class B1 Seal” and “Class B2 Seal” for manufactured and mobile homes shall be established by the department subject to a maximum of twenty-five dollars ($25) per seal.

All revenues raised under subsection (4)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, and funds paid to the state by the secretary under subsection (4)(d) of this section shall be deposited in a trust and agency fund and shall be used solely for the purpose of carrying out KRS

227.550

to

227.660

and other departmental responsibilities. No amount of the trust and agency fund shall lapse at the end of any fiscal year.

The licenses of retailers shall specify the location of the established place of business and shall be conspicuously displayed there. If the location denoted on the license changes, the retailer shall notify the department of the change, and the department shall update the change of location on the license without charge if it be within the same municipality. A change of location to another municipality or to a county which is not adjacent to the county where the business is located shall require a new license.

Every retailer licensed in accordance with this section shall make reports to the department at times specified by the department and containing any information the department may require.

Each manufacturer, distributor of manufactured homes or mobile homes, and retailer of manufactured or mobile homes shall establish and maintain records, make reports, and provide any information the department or the secretary may reasonably require to determine whether the manufacturer, distributor, or retailer has acted or is acting in compliance with KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or the federal act. A manufacturer, distributor of manufactured homes or mobile homes, and retailer of manufactured or mobile homes shall, upon request of a person duly designated by the department or secretary, permit that person to inspect appropriate books, papers, records, and documents relevant to determining whether the manufacturer, distributor, or retailer has acted or is acting in compliance with KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or the federal act.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 8; 1976, ch. 136, § 7; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 19, § 12, effective May 12, 1979; 1980, ch. 200, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 340, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 182, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 217, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 420, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 80, effective June 29, 2017.

227.625.
Liability insurance — Prerequisite for license.

Before any license is issued or renewed, the applicant shall file or have on file with the department a liability insurance policy issued by an insurance carrier authorized to transact insurance business within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The policy of insurance shall be issued in the name of the applicant licensee.

The department shall by administrative regulation establish the minimum amount of liability insurance coverage required under this section.

An insurance carrier issuing any policy filed with the department shall not be relieved from liability under the policy until after the expiration of fifteen (15) days’ notice to the department of an intention to cancel the policy, provided, however, that a prior cancellation may be allowed in cases where one (1) policy is substituted for another policy when the substituted policy is in force and effect prior to the expiration of fifteen (15) days’ notice to the department of an intention to cancel the policy which is being substituted.

Upon cancellation of any policy of insurance required by this section, all operating rights granted by the license for which the policy was filed shall immediately cease, and the department shall have the authority to immediately require the cessation of all operations conducted under the authority of that license and to require the surrender of all licenses, certificates, and seals previously issued hereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 136, § 8; 2010, ch. 24, § 421, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 81, effective June 29, 2017.

227.630.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of license or certificate of acceptability — Payments in lieu of suspension.

A license, certification, or certificate of acceptability may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

A showing of insolvency in a court of competent jurisdiction;

Material misstatement in application for license, certification, or certificate of acceptability;

Willful failure to comply with any provisions of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or any administrative regulation promulgated by the department under KRS

227.550

to

227.660

;

Willfully defrauding any buyer;

Willful failure to perform any written agreement with any buyer or retailer;

Failure to have or to maintain an established place of business;

Failure to furnish or maintain the required insurance;

Making a fraudulent sale, transaction, or repossession;

Employment of fraudulent devices, methods, or practices in connection with the requirements under the statutes of this state with respect to the retaking of goods under retail installment contracts and the redemption and resale of such goods;

Failure by a retailer to put the title to a manufactured home, mobile home, or recreational vehicle in his name after said retailer has acquired ownership of the manufactured home, mobile home, or recreational vehicle by trade or otherwise; or

Violation of any law relating to the sale or financing of manufactured homes, mobile homes, or recreational vehicles, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.

If a licensee is a firm or corporation, it shall be sufficient cause for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license if any officer, director, or trustee of the firm or corporation, or any member in case of a partnership, has been guilty of any act or omission which would be cause for refusing, suspending, or revoking a license to that party as an individual. Each licensee shall be responsible for any or all of his or her salespersons while they are acting as agents of the licensee and within the scope of their authority.

Upon proceedings for the suspension of a license, certification, or certificate of acceptability for any of the violations enumerated in KRS

227.550

to

227.660

, the licensee or holder of a certificate of acceptability may have the alternative, subject to the approval of the department, to pay in lieu of part or all of the days of any suspension the sum of fifty dollars ($50) per day. Payments in lieu of suspension collected by the department shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the general expenditure fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 9; 1976, ch. 136, § 9; 1996, ch. 340, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 10, effective July 13, 2004; 2017 ch. 158, § 39, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 169, § 82, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 158 and
169, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

227.640.
Procedure for denial, suspension, or revocation of license or certificate of acceptability — Dispute resolution process — Appeal.

The department or its designee may deny the application for a license, certification, or certificate of acceptability within thirty (30) days after receipt thereof by written notice to the applicant, stating the grounds for the denial.

No license, certification, or certificate of acceptability shall be suspended or revoked by the department unless the licensee or certificate holder is afforded the opportunity for a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any manufacturer, certified installer, or licensed retailer who violates or fails to comply with KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder shall be notified in writing setting forth facts describing the alleged violation and instructed to correct the violation, if it is correctable, within twenty (20) days. If the manufacturer, certified installer, or retailer fails to make the necessary corrections within the specified time or if the violation is not correctable, the department may, after notice and hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, suspend or revoke any certificate of acceptability, certification, or license if it finds that:

The manufacturer, certified installer, or retailer has failed to pay the fees authorized by KRS

227.550

to

227.660

;

The manufacturer, certified installer, or retailer, either knowingly or without the exercise of due care to prevent the same, has violated any provision of KRS 227.550 to 227.660 or any administrative regulation or order lawfully made pursuant to and within the authority of KRS 227.550 to 227.660; or

The manufacturer has shipped or imported into this state a manufactured home or mobile home to any person other than to a duly licensed retailer.

The department shall establish, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, a dispute resolution process which may be used prior to a formal hearing under KRS Chapter 13B. The dispute resolution process shall be nonbinding on the licensee, certified installer, or manufacturer and shall be conducted after application for a KRS Chapter 13B hearing, but prior to the convening of the KRS Chapter 13B hearing.

Any person aggrieved by any final order of the department may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 12; 1980, ch. 200, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 147, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 340, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 217, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 422, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 83, effective June 29, 2017.

227.650.
Inspection powers — Training programs for local government personnel.

The department is empowered to inspect all mobile homes which are not covered by the federal act and previously owned recreational vehicles for which it has issued a seal of approval.

The department may establish and require training programs in the concept, techniques, and inspection of manufactured homes, mobile homes, and previously owned recreational vehicles for the personnel of local governments, as the department considers necessary.

The staff of the department, upon showing proper credentials and in the discharge of their duties pursuant to KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or the federal act, shall be permitted with the consent of the manufacturer or by proper warrant to enter and inspect all factories, warehouses, or establishments in this state in which manufactured homes are manufactured or stored.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 10; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 19, § 3, effective May 12, 1979; 1980, ch. 200, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 340, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 74, § 12, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 217, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 423, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 84, effective June 29, 2017.

227.660.
State inspectors.

Subject to KRS Chapters 18A and 64, the department may set qualifications for, employ, and fix the compensation of state inspectors as the department deems necessary to carry out the functions of KRS

227.550

to

227.650

. To carry out KRS

227.550

to

227.650

, the department may authorize the state inspectors to travel within or outside the state for the purposes of inspecting the manufacturing facilities for manufactured homes or for any other purpose in connection with KRS 227.550 to 227.650.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 11; 1982, ch. 448, § 14; 1996, ch. 340, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 217, § 9, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 424, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 85, effective June 29, 2017.

227.665.
Recreational and park vehicles to be constructed in accordance with ANSI standards.

All recreational vehicles sold, leased, or offered for sale or lease by a retailer to a consumer in this state shall be constructed in accordance with the most recent ANSI standards on recreational vehicles.

All park vehicles sold, leased, or offered for sale or lease by a retailer to a consumer in this state shall be constructed in accordance with the most recent ANSI standards on park vehicles.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.